Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
§ 56-589.1.
Energy generation by public school buildings and facilities.

A school board of a school division located in a locality that is a non-jurisdictional customer of a utility pursuant to § 56-234 and that owns or operates a public school building or facility that has been modernized consistent with Article 3 (§ 22.1-141.1
et seq.) of Chapter 9 of Title 22.1 and generates energy derived from sunlight and the solar generating facility is interconnected pursuant to § 56-594 may enter into a contract to generate such energy on terms and conditions negotiated
between the customer and the utility.

The solar-powered renewable energy generation facilities associated with a public school building or facility owned or operated by a school board shall be located on the same real property upon which the public school buildings and facilities are located.
The solar facilities shall be located on the rooftops of the public school buildings and facilities, however up to 20 percent of the capacity may come from ground mounted solar facilities.

Neither jurisdictional customers nor non-jurisdictional customers that do not participate in a school modernization project consistent with Article 3 (§ 22.1-141.1 et seq.) of Chapter 9 of Title 22.1 shall bear any costs associated with such school modernization
project by a participating non-jurisdictional customer.

History.
2019, cc. 818, 819.

§ 56-590.
Divestiture, functional separation and other corporate relationships.

The Commission shall not require any incumbent electric utility to divest itself of any generation, transmission or distribution assets pursuant to any provision of this chapter.

The Commission shall, however, direct the functional separation of generation, retail transmission and distribution of all incumbent electric utilities in connection with the provisions of this chapter to be completed by January 1, 2002. B. 1. The Commission
shall, however, direct the functional separation of generation, retail transmission and distribution of all incumbent electric utilities in connection with the provisions of this chapter to be completed by January 1, 2002.

By January 1, 2001, each incumbent electric utility shall submit to the Commission a plan for such functional separation which may be accomplished through the creation of affiliates, or through such other means as may be acceptable to the Commission.

Consistent with this chapter, the Commission may impose conditions, as the public interest requires, upon its approval of any incumbent electric utility’s plan for functional separation, including requirements that (i) the incumbent electric utility’s
generation assets or, at the election of the incumbent electric utility and if approved by the Commission pursuant to subdivision 4 of this subsection, their equivalent are made available for electric service during the
capped rate period as provided in § 56-582 and, if applicable, during any period the distributor serves as a default provider as provided for in § 56-585; (ii) the incumbent electric utility receive Commission approval
for the sale, transfer or other disposition of generation assets during the capped rate period and, if applicable, during any period the distributor serves as a default provider; and (iii) any such generation asset sold,
transferred, or otherwise disposed of by the incumbent electric utility with Commission approval shall not be further sold, transferred, or otherwise disposed of during the capped rate period and, if applicable, during
any period the distributor serves as default provider, without additional Commission approval.

If an incumbent electric utility proposes that the equivalent to its generation assets be made available pursuant to subdivision 3 of this subsection, the Commission shall determine the adequacy of such proposal and shall approve or reject such proposal
based on the public interest.

In exercising its authority under the provisions of this section and under § 56-90, the Commission shall have no authority to regulate, on a cost-of-service basis or other basis, the price at which generation assets or their equivalent are made available
for default service purposes. Such restriction on the Commission’s authority to regulate, on a cost-of-service basis or other basis, prices for default service shall not affect the ability of a distributor to offer to provide,
and of the Commission to approve if appropriate the provision of, such services on a cost plus basis or any other basis. The Commission’s authority to regulate the price of default service shall be consistent with the pricing
provisions applicable to a distributor pursuant to § 56-585. In addition, the Commission shall, in exercising its responsibilities under this section and under § 56-90, consider, among other factors, the potential effects
of any such transfer on: (i) rates and reliability of capped rate service under § 56-582, and of default service under § 56-585, and (ii) the development of a competitive market in the Commonwealth for retail generation
services. However, the Commission may not deny approval of a transfer proposed by an incumbent electric utility, pursuant to subdivisions 2 and 4 of this subsection, due to an inability to determine, at the time of consideration
of the transfer, default service prices under § 56-585.

The Commission shall, to the extent necessary to promote effective competition in the Commonwealth, promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this section, which rules and regulations shall include provisions:

Prohibiting cost-shifting or cross-subsidies between functionally separate units;

Prohibiting functionally separate units from engaging in anticompetitive behavior or self-dealing;

Prohibiting affiliated entities from engaging in discriminatory behavior towards nonaffiliated units; and

Establishing codes of conduct detailing permissible relations between functionally separate units.

Neither a covered entity nor an affiliate thereof may be a party to a covered transaction without the prior approval of the Commission. Any such person proposing to be a party to such transaction shall file an application with the Commission. The Commission
shall approve or disapprove such transaction within sixty days after the filing of a completed application; however, the sixty-day period may be extended by Commission order for a period not to exceed an additional 120 days. The
application shall be deemed approved if the Commission fails to act within such initial or extended period. The Commission shall approve such application if it finds, after notice and opportunity for hearing, that the transaction
will comply with the requirements of subsection E, and may, as a part of its approval, establish such conditions or limitations on such transaction as it finds necessary to ensure compliance with subsection E.

A transaction described in subsection D shall not:

Substantially lessen competition among the actual or prospective providers of noncompetitive electric service or of a service which is, or is likely to become, a competitive electric service; or

Jeopardize or impair the safety or reliability of electric service in the Commonwealth, or the provision of any noncompetitive electric service at just and reasonable rates.

Except as provided in subdivision B 5, nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to abrogate or modify the Commission’s authority under Chapter 3 (§ 56-55 et seq.), 4 (§ 56-76 et seq.) or 5 (§ 56-88 et seq.) of this title. However, any person subject to
the requirements of subsection D that is also subject to the requirements of Chapter 5 of this title may be exempted from compliance with the requirements of Chapter 5 of this title.

History.
1999, c. 411; 2000, c. 991; 2001, c. 748; 2007, cc. 888, 933.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 748, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of clause (iii) of subdivision B 3 of § 56-590 of the Code of Virginia shall not apply to any sale, transfer or disposal of an incumbent electric utility’s generation assets that was approved by
the Commission pursuant to such subdivision as it was in effect prior to the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2007, cc. 888 and 933, cl. 5 provides: “That nothing in this act shall be deemed to modify or impair the terms, unless otherwise modified by an order of the State Corporation Commission, of any order of the State Corporation Commission approving
the divestiture of generation assets that was entered pursuant to § 56-590 of the Code of Virginia.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 991 substituted “any” for “the” in subdivision B 3, and added subdivision C, and redesignated former subsections C, D, E and F as present subsections D, E, F, and G respectively.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 748, in subdivision B 3, in clause (i), substituted “at the election of the incumbent electric utility and if approved by the Commission pursuant to subdivision 4 of this subsection, their equivalent are made” for “their equivalent
remain,” substituted “distributor” for “incumbent electric utility,” and deleted “and” at the end thereof, in clause (ii), substituted “distributor serves as a default provide; and” for “incumbent electric utility serves as a default
provider,” and added clause (iii); added subdivisions 4 and 5; and inserted “Except as provided in subdivision B 5 of § 56-590” at the beginning of subsection G.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and deleted “in any competitive bidding process pursuant to subdivision B 2 of § 56-585” following “such services” in the second sentence in subdivision B 5; and deleted subsection C, requiring each
affected incumbent electric utility to submit for the Commission’s approval, and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 56-591.
Application of antitrust laws.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exempt or immunize from punishment or prosecution, conduct violative of federal antitrust laws, or the antitrust laws of this Commonwealth.

History.
1999, c. 411.

§ 56-592.
Consumer education and marketing practices.

The Commission shall develop an electric energy consumer education program designed to provide the following information to retail customers:

Information regarding energy conservation, energy efficiency, demand-side management, demand response, and renewable energy;

Information concerning demand-side management and demand response programs offered in the Commonwealth to retail customers;

Information regarding the matters described in subdivisions 1 and 2 that are specifically designed for the industrial, commercial, residential, and government sectors; and

Such other information as the Commission may deem necessary and appropriate in the public interest.

The Commission shall complete the development of the consumer education program described in subsection A, and report its findings and recommendations to the Commission on Electric Utility Regulation as frequently as may be required by such Commission
concerning:

The scope of such recommended program consistent with the requirements of subsection A;

Materials and media required to effectuate any such program;

State agency and nongovernmental entity participation;

Program duration;

Funding requirements and mechanisms for any such program; and

Such other findings and recommendations the Commission deems appropriate in the public interest.

The Commission shall develop regulations governing marketing practices by public service companies, licensed suppliers, aggregators or any other providers of services made competitive by this chapter, including regulations to prevent unauthorized switching
of suppliers, unauthorized charges, and improper solicitation activities. The Commission shall also establish standards for marketing information to be furnished by licensed suppliers, aggregators or any other providers of services
made competitive by this chapter, which information shall include standards concerning:

Pricing and other key contract terms and conditions;

To the extent feasible, fuel mix and emissions data on at least an annualized basis;

Customer’s rights of cancellation following execution of any contract;

Toll-free telephone number for customer assistance; and

Such other and further marketing information as the Commission may deem necessary and appropriate in the public interest.

The Commission shall also establish standards for billing information to be furnished by public service companies, suppliers, aggregators or any other providers of services made competitive by this chapter. Such billing information standards shall require
that billing formation:

Distinguishes between charges for regulated services and unregulated services;

Is presented in a format that complies with standards to be established by the Commission;

Discloses, to the extent feasible, fuel mix and emissions data on at least an annualized basis; and

Includes such other billing information as the Commission deems necessary and appropriate in the public interest.

The Commission shall establish or maintain a complaint bureau for the purpose of receiving, reviewing and investigating complaints by retail customers against public service companies, licensed suppliers, aggregators and other providers of any services
made competitive under this chapter. Upon the request of any interested person or the Attorney General, or upon its own motion, the Commission shall be authorized to inquire into possible violations of this chapter and to enjoin
or punish any violations thereof pursuant to its authority under this chapter, this title, and under Title 12.1. The Attorney General shall have a right to participate in such proceedings consistent with the Commission’s Rules
of Practice and Procedure.

The Commission shall establish reasonable limits on customer security deposits required by public service companies, suppliers, aggregators or any other persons providing competitive services pursuant to this chapter.

History.
1999, c. 411; 2003, c. 885; 2008, c. 883.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 883, cl. 3, provides: “That the State Corporation Commission, in its development, establishment, and implementation of consumer education programs as required by §§ 56-592 and 56-592.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall convene a work group
on consumer education issues, which work group shall be charged with continuing the process, commenced in State Corporation Commission Case PUE-2007-00049, of identifying consumer education needs and opportunities pertaining to energy
efficiency, energy conservation, demand side management, and demand response.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 885 substituted “Commission on Electric Utility Restructuring” for “Legislative Transition Task Force”, and “such Commission” for “the Task Force” in subsection B.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 883 rewrote subsection A; in the introductory paragraph in subsection B, substituted “Regulation as frequently” for “Restructuring on or before December 1, 1999, and as frequently thereafter”; in the introductory paragraphs in
subsections C and D, deleted “during the period of transition to retail competition, and thereafter” preceding “which information” in the last sentence of subsection C and at the end of the next-to-last sentence in subsection D; and
deleted former subdivision D 2, regarding itemizing nonbypassable wires charges and made related changes.

§ 56-592.1.
Consumer education program; scope and funding.

The Commission shall establish and implement the consumer education program developed pursuant to subsection A of § 56-592. In establishing such a program, the Commission shall take into account the findings and recommendations of the subgroup on Information/Consumer
Education that was established in conjunction with the Commission’s proceeding in Case PUE-2007-00049, that implemented the third enactment of Chapters 888 and 933 of the Acts of Assembly of 2007.

The program shall be designed to (i) enable consumers to make rational and informed choices about the matters described in subsection A of § 56-592, including but not limited to demand side management, energy conservation, and energy efficiency, (ii)
help consumers reduce transaction costs in making decisions regarding such matters, and (iii) foster compliance with the consumer protection provisions of this chapter.

The Commission shall regularly consult with representatives of consumer organizations, community-based groups, state agencies, incumbent utilities, and other interested parties throughout the program’s implementation and operation.

Pursuant to the provisions of § 30-205, the Commission shall provide periodic updates to the Commission on Electric Utility Regulation concerning the program’s implementation and operation.

The Commission shall fund the establishment and operation of such consumer education program through the special regulatory revenue tax currently authorized by §

58.1-2660

and the special regulatory tax authorized by Chapter 29 (§

58.1-2900

et seq.) of Title 58.1.

History.
2000, c. 991; 2003, c. 885; 2008, c. 883.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 883, cl. 3, provides: “That the State Corporation Commission, in its development, establishment, and implementation of consumer education programs as required by §§ 56-592 and 56-592.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall convene a work group
on consumer education issues, which work group shall be charged with continuing the process, commenced in State Corporation Commission Case PUE-2007-00049, of identifying consumer education needs and opportunities pertaining to energy
efficiency, energy conservation, demand side management, and demand response.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 885 in subsection A, substituted “the predecessor of the Commission on Electric Utility Restructuring” for “made pursuant to § 56-592” and in subsection D, substituted “30-205” for “56-595” and “Commission on Electric Utility
Restructuring” for “Legislative Transition Task Force.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 883 rewrote subsections A and B; deleted “competitive suppliers” following “incumbent utilities” in subsection C; and substituted “Regulation” for “Restructuring” in subsection D.

§ 56-593.
Retail customers’ private right of action; marketing practices.

No entity subject to this chapter shall use any deception, fraud, false pretense, misrepresentation, or any deceptive or unfair practices in providing, distributing or marketing electric service.

Any person who suffers loss (i) as the result of marketing practices, including telemarketing practices, engaged in by any public service company, licensed supplier, aggregator or any other provider of any service made competitive under this chapter,
and in violation of subsection C of § 56-592, including any rule or regulation adopted by the Commission pursuant thereto, or (ii) as the result of any violation of subsection A, shall be entitled to initiate an action
to recover actual damages, or $500, whichever is greater. If the trier of fact finds that the violation was willful, it may increase damages to an amount not exceeding three times the actual damages sustained, or $1,000,
whichever is greater. B. 1. Any person who suffers loss (i) as the result of marketing practices, including telemarketing practices, engaged in by any public service company, licensed supplier, aggregator or any other provider
of any service made competitive under this chapter, and in violation of subsection C of § 56-592, including any rule or regulation adopted by the Commission pursuant thereto, or (ii) as the result of any violation of subsection
A, shall be entitled to initiate an action to recover actual damages, or $500, whichever is greater. If the trier of fact finds that the violation was willful, it may increase damages to an amount not exceeding three times
the actual damages sustained, or $1,000, whichever is greater.

Upon referral from the Commission, the Attorney General, the attorney for the Commonwealth, or the attorney for any city, county, or town may cause an action to be brought in the appropriate circuit court for relief of violations within the scope of (i)
subsection C of § 56-592, including any rule or regulation adopted by the Commission pursuant thereto or (ii) subsection A.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in addition to any damages awarded, such person, or any governmental agency initiating such action, also may be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.

Any action pursuant to this section shall be commenced within two years after its accrual. The cause of action shall accrue as provided in §

8.01-230

. However, if the Commission initiates proceedings, or any other governmental agency files suit for the purpose of enforcing subsection A of this section or the provisions of subsection C of § 56-592, the time during
which such proceeding or governmental suit and all appeals therefrom is pending shall not be counted as any part of the period within which an action under this section shall be brought.

The circuit court may make such additional orders or decrees as may be necessary to restore to any identifiable person any money or property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, which may have been acquired from such person by means of any
act or practice violative of subsection A of this section or subsection C of § 56-592, provided, that such person shall be identified by order of the court within 180 days from the date of any order permanently enjoining the unlawful
act or practice.

In any case arising under this section, no liability shall be imposed upon any licensed supplier, aggregator or any other provider of any service made competitive under this chapter, who shows by a preponderance of the evidence that (i) the act or practice
alleged to be in violation of subsection A of this section or subsection C of § 56-592 was an act or practice over which the same had no control or (ii) the alleged violation resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the
maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid a violation. However, nothing in this section shall prevent the court from ordering restitution and payment of reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs pursuant to subsection
C to individuals aggrieved as a result of an unintentional violation of subsection A of this section or subsection C of § 56-592.

History.
1999, c. 411; 2000, c. 991.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 991 inserted “of this section” following “subsection A” in subsections D, E, and F.